West Virginia, session 2026, HB4285.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Contractor Licensing Board. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-42-5 of this code, relating to the Contractor Licensing Board (West Virginia Contractor Licensing Act, 28 CSR 02), is authorized.